Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 7.
Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act.

§§ 20-125 through 20-146.

Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 305.

Cross references.

- For the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, see
§
20-146.1 et seq.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2001, c. 305 enacted Chapter 7.1 of Title 20,
§§
20-146.1 through 20-146.38, the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, and repealed Chapter 7 of Title 20,

§§

20-125 through 20-146, the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act.

For table of comparable sections, see the table in Volume 10.